Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-374
Subdivisions; platting; requirements.

No plat of real property, described in section 23-373, shall be recorded or have any force and effect unless the same be approved by the county board of such county. The county board of such county shall have power, by resolution, to provide the manner, plan, or method by which real property in any such area may be subdivided, platted, or laid out, including a plan or system for the avenues, streets, or alleys to be laid out within or across the same including the hard surfacing thereof.

Laws 1961, c. 94, § 3, p. 322.